Utah statutes.
76-10-3113.   Conviction as prima facie evidence in action for injunctive relief or damages.

In any action brought by the state, a final judgment or decree determining that a person has criminally violated this act, other than a judgment entered pursuant to a nolo contendere plea or a decree entered prior to the taking of any testimony, shall be prima facie evidence against that person in any action brought pursuant to Section 76-10-3109, as to all matters with respect to which the judgment or decree would be an estoppel between the parties thereto.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 187, 2013 General Session

